Utah statutes.
7-3-22.   Certificates and evidences of deposit binding -- Issuance of items intended to circulate as money prohibited.

All certificates or evidences of deposit made by the proper officers of any bank bind the bank with or without its corporate seal affixed. No bank shall issue any bill, note, or certificate intended to circulate as money.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

